Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1249.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:

SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified

in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 3242.4 of Title 70, unless there

is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:

A. Beginning with the 2026-2027 academic year, an institution

of higher education within The Oklahoma State System of Higher

Education shall be prohibited from using state funds to provide a

scholarship, a grant, tuition aid, or discounted tuition to foreign

national students who are enrolled in the institution.

B. The Oklahoma State Regents for Higher Education shall

promulgate rules to implement the provisions of this section.

SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2026.

Req. No. 2213 Page 1

SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation

of the public peace, health, or safety, an emergency is hereby

declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and

be in full force from and after its passage and approval.



60-2-2213 EB 12/15/2025 3:48:23 PM





































Req. No. 2213 Page 2